Utah statutes.
13-37-201.   Required notice.

(1) (a)  In accordance with this section, a commercial entity shall provide the notice described in this section to a person if:

(i)  the commercial entity enters into a consumer transaction with that person;

(ii)  as a result of the consumer transaction described in this Subsection (1)(a), the commercial entity obtains nonpublic personal information concerning that person; and

(iii)  the commercial entity intends to or wants the ability to disclose the nonpublic personal information:

(A)  to a third party; and

(B)  for compensation; and

(iv)  the compensation described in Subsection (1)(a)(iii)(B):

(A)  is the primary consideration for the commercial entity disclosing the nonpublic personal information;

(B)  is directly related to the commercial entity disclosing the nonpublic personal information; and

(C)  is not compensation received by the commercial entity in consideration of a transaction described in Subsection (5).

(b)  For purposes of this chapter, a commercial entity is considered to have obtained information as a result of a consumer transaction if:

(i)  the person provides the information to the commercial entity:

(A)  at any time during the consumer transaction; and

(B)  at the request of the commercial entity; or

(ii) (A)  the commercial entity otherwise obtains the information; and

(B)  but for the consumer transaction, the commercial entity would not obtain the information.

(2)  The notice required by Subsection (1) shall be given before the earlier of:

(a)  the point at which the person is requested to provide the nonpublic personal information; or

(b)  the commercial entity otherwise obtains the nonpublic personal information as a result of the consumer transaction described in Subsection (1)(a).

(3)  The notice required by Subsection (1):

(a)   shall read substantially as follows:  "We may choose to disclose nonpublic personal information about you, the consumer, to a third party for compensation.";

(b)  may be made:

(i)  orally, if the consumer transaction itself is entirely conducted orally; or

(ii)  in writing, if the notice is written in dark bold; and

(c)  shall be sufficiently conspicuous so that a reasonable person would perceive the notice before providing the nonpublic personal information.

(4)  This chapter does not apply to:

(a)  a commercial entity that is subject to a federal law or regulation that governs the disclosure of nonpublic information to a third party; or

(b)  a covered entity as defined in 45 C.F.R. Parts 160 and 164.

(5)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a commercial entity is not required to provide notice under this section if:

(a)  the disclosure of the nonpublic personal information is related to the third party providing to the commercial entity:

(i)  services, including business outsource services;

(ii)  personal or real property; or

(iii)  other thing of value; and

(b)  compensation received by the commercial entity as part of the transaction is received by the commercial entity for or in consideration of the transaction described in Subsection (5)(a).

